Massachusetts, session 194th, S655.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 22 of chapter 25 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subparagraph (e) the following
subparagraphs:-
(f) Public and private water utilities shall file quarterly reports with the executive office
of energy and environmental affairs regarding customer service data. The reports shall be public
record and shall include, but shall not be limited to the following information, disaggregated by
zip codes:
(1) The number of customers receiving service from a water utility provider;
(2) The number customer disconnection notices sent due to bill nonpayment;
of 3

(3) The number and dates of water shut offs that took place and average time between
service disconnection due to non-payment and service reconnection;
(4) The number of customer accounts that became eligible for disconnection due to bill
nonpayment but were not disconnected because of any legally mandated or voluntary suspension
of disconnections due to the coronavirus 2019 pandemic;
(5) The number of customers charged late fees, penalties, reconnection fees, interest, and
any other charge associated with late payment of a bill;
(6) The number of liens on real property placed, sold, or enforced due to nonpayment;
(7) The number of customers enrolled in deferred payment agreements at the end of each
month, and the average length of the repayment term under those agreements;
(8) The number of customers that entered into, successfully completed, or defaulted from
a deferred payment agreement;
(9) Customer assistance programs available to water consumers, including terms of
eligibility, and available budget for each program;
(10) The number of customers receiving assistance under each customer assistance
program at the end of each month, the total dollar amount of assistance provided, and the number
of customers who were denied assistance; and
(11) The methods and contents of general communications by local utilities and public
utilities to customers concerning their rights and available assistance programs if customers are
unable to pay their bills in full.
of 3

(g) The executive office of energy and environmental affairs may adopt regulations
necessary to implement this section.
(h) Annually, not later than March 15, the executive office of energy and environmental
affairs shall report to the senate and house committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on environment, natural resources and agriculture data concerning the results of such
equity audit reports.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
of 3